Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.103.040

Simultaneous use permitted.

A guard member and the guard member's designated spouse and dependents may simultaneously use the grant, subject to any rules adopted by the office, and the limitation on the maximum benefit.

[ 2024 c 178 s 4.]